Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1004
Notice; filing; fees; billing.

(1) The uniform fee, payable to the Secretary of State, for presenting for filing and indexing and for filing and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien pursuant to the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act shall be two times the fee required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided in section 33-109. There shall be no fee for the filing of a termination statement. The uniform fee for each county more than one designated pursuant to subsection (1) of section 52-1001 shall be the fee required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided in section 33-109. The Secretary of State shall remit each fee received pursuant to this subsection to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund, except that of the fees received pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary of State shall remit the fee required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided in section 33-109 to the register of deeds of a county for each designation of such county in a filing pursuant to subsection (1) of section 52-1001.

(2) The Secretary of State shall bill the district directors of internal revenue or other appropriate federal officials on a monthly basis for fees for documents presented or filed by them.

Laws 1969, c. 433, § 4, p. 1458;

Laws 1984, LB 808, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 933, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 86;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 23;

Laws 2012, LB14, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB152, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB268, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 18.
July 1, 2021